Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4518
Director; duties.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to promote premium adequacy, to protect the policyholder in the event of substantial rate increases, and to establish minimum standards for marketing practices, agent compensation, agent testing, penalties, and reporting practices for long-term care insurance.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 51;

Laws 1999, LB 323, § 4.